src/morphology/stems/hdn-propernouns.lexc
LEXICON prop
+N: # ;

LEXICON Propernouns
Alice prop ;
Amy prop ;
Andy prop ;
Ann prop ;
Ben prop ;
Betty prop ;
Bill prop ;
Bob prop ;
Cathy prop ;
Charlie prop ;
Emily prop ;
Frank prop ;
Ga prop ;
Hiro prop ;
Hl prop ;
Jane prop ;
Jennie prop ;
Jim prop ;
Jimmy prop ;
Joe prop ;
John prop ;
Kathy prop ;
Linda prop ;
Mark prop ;
Mary prop ;
Nancy prop ;
Nang prop ;
Pat prop ;
Paul prop ;
Robert prop ;
Sarah prop ;
Shirley prop ;
Steve prop ;
Tammy prop ;
Tom prop ;
